test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: теневавэхэюти’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: теневавыди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: теневавыди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: теневавыти’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: теневавэхэти’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: теневавэхэ”нати’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [теневавэхэтати’, теневавэхэтти’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: теневавы”манати’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: теневавэва”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: теневавэва”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: теневавэна”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: теневавэхэна”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: теневавэхэнана”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [теневавэхэдана”, теневавэхэдна”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: теневавэвнана”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: теневавэхэюна”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: теневавэхэюна”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: теневавэхэюна”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: теневавына”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: теневавына”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: теневавы”на”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: теневавэхэ”на”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: теневавэхэ”нана”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [теневавэхэтана”, теневавэхэтна”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: теневавы”манана”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: теневавэра”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: теневавэмда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: теневавэнда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: теневавэхэнда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: теневавэхэнанда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: теневавэхэданда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: теневавэвнанда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: теневавэхэюда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: теневавэхэюда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: теневавэхэюта”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: теневавыда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: теневавыда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: теневавыта”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: теневавэхэта”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: теневавэхэ”ната”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [теневавэхэтата”, теневавэхэтта”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: теневавы”маната”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: теневавэдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: теневавэмдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: теневавэндо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: теневавэхэндо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: теневавэхэнандо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: теневавэхэдандо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: теневавэвнандо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: теневавэхэюдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: теневавэхэюдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: теневавэхэюто’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: теневавыдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: теневавыдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: теневавыто’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: теневавэхэто’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: теневавэхэ”нато’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [теневавэхэтато’, теневавэхэтто’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: теневавы”манато’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Abs: теневавэд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавэдав, теневавэдув, теневавэдами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавэдав, теневавэдув, теневавэдами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [теневавэдан, теневавэдани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: теневавэдар
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: теневавэдамд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: теневавэданд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: теневавэдада
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: теневавэдамда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: теневавэданда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: теневавэдами’
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневавэдами
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: теневавэдами’
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневавэдами
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: теневавэдани’
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневавэдани
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: теневавэдари’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: теневавэдамди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: теневавэданди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: теневавэдади’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: теневавэдамди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: теневавэданди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: теневавэдава”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: теневавэдава”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: теневавэдана”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: теневавэдара”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: теневавэдамда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: теневавэданда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: теневавэдадо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: теневавэдамдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: теневавэдандо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: теневавэдм’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: теневавэн
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: теневавы
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: теневавэни’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: теневавэди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: теневавэхэ’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: теневавэва”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: теневавэда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: теневавы”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: теневавэдамзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: теневавэнась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: [теневавысь, теневавэсь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: теневавэнинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: теневавэдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: теневавэхэнзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: теневавэваць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: теневавэдаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: [теневавыць, теневавэць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: теневавэв
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: теневавэр
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: теневавэда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: теневавэми’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: теневавэри’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: теневавэди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: теневавэва”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: теневавэра”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: теневавэдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: теневавэвась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: теневавэрась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: теневавэдась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: теневавэминзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: теневавэринзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: теневавэдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: теневавэваць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: теневавэраць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: теневавэдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: теневавэхэюн
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: теневавэхэюд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: теневавэхэюда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: теневавэхэюни’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: теневавэхэюди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: теневавэхэюди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: теневавэхэюна”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: теневавэхэюда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: теневавэхэюдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: теневавэхэюнась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: теневавэхэюдась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: теневавэхэюдась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: теневавэхэюнинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: теневавэхэюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: теневавэхэюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: теневавэхэюнаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: теневавэхэюдаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: теневавэхэюдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: теневавын
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: теневавыд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: теневавыда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: теневавыни’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: теневавыди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: теневавыди’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: теневавына”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: теневавыда”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: теневавыдо’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: теневавынась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: теневавыдась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: теневавыдась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: теневавынинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: теневавыдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: теневавыдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: теневавынаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: теневавыдаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: теневавыдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Tra: теневавэӈэ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Car: теневавэси”
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Equ: теневавэдарем’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Equ+Lat: теневавэдарев’
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Nom+Abs: [теневавнда, теневувнда]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Acc+Abs: [теневавндам’, теневувндам’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Gen+Abs: [теневавнда’, теневувнда’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Dat+Abs: [теневавндан’, теневувндан’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Loc+Abs: [теневавндахана, теневувндахана]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Abl+Abs: [теневавндахад, теневувндахад]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Pros+Abs: [теневавндавна, теневувндавна]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Nom+Abs: [теневавндаха’, теневувндаха’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Acc+Abs: [теневавндаха’, теневувндаха’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Gen+Abs: [теневавндаха’, теневувндаха’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Nom+Abs: [теневавнда”, теневувнда”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Acc+Abs: [теневавнди, теневувнди]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Gen+Abs: [теневавнди”, теневувнди”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Dat+Abs: [теневавндаха”, теневувндаха”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Loc+Abs: [теневавндаха”на, теневувндаха”на]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Abl+Abs: [теневавндахат, теневувндахат]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Pros+Abs: [теневавнди”мна, теневувнди”мна]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавндав, теневувндав, теневавндами, теневувндами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавндав, теневувндав, теневавндами, теневувндами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [теневавндан, теневувндан, теневавндани, теневувндани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [теневавндахан, теневувндахан, теневавндахани, теневувндахани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [теневавндаханан, теневувндаханан, теневавндаханани, теневувндаханани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [теневавндахадан, теневувндахадан, теневавндахадани, теневувндахадани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [теневавндавнан, теневувндавнан, теневавндавнани, теневувндавнани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавндахаюн, теневувндахаюн, теневавндахаюни, теневувндахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавндахаюн, теневувндахаюн, теневавндахаюни, теневувндахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [теневавндахаюн, теневувндахаюн, теневавндахаюни, теневувндахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавндин, теневувндин, теневавндини, теневувндини]
